tests/passive.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tki.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tki.automorf.hfst

Tests:


  "[twol] passsive {L} l:ن" :


  باشلا<v><iv><pass><past>+i<cop><aor><p3><frm><sg>: باشلانمشتر
  اوخو<v><tv><pass><ger><px3sp><nom>: اوخونماسی

  "[twol] {L} l:ل" :



  ئت<v><tv><pass><ger><px3sp><nom>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg><gm>: ئدیلماسی
  سیو<v><tv><pass><ger><px3sp><nom>: سیولماسی
